english1.xfst
# comments
# clear stack
clear
set char-encoding utf-8
# compile
read lexc < english1-lexc.txt
compose net
# fst file allows you to use lookup
save stack english1.fst
write prolog > english1.plg
write dot > english1.dot
define Lexicon;
# delete e before -ing or -ed
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;
# insert e after sibilants before suffix s
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;
# replace y with ie before -s and with i before -ed suffixes.
# BAD LINE define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s ,,
# insert k if verb ends in c preceded by a vowel
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [ e d | i n g ];
# doubled g before suffixes -ing or -ed
define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ];
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;
# do these need to be ordered? Is there bleeding/feeding?
define Grammar 	Lexicon .o.
				EDeletion .o.
				KInsertion .o.
				ConsonantDoubling .o.
				EInsertion .o.
				Cleanup;
read regex Grammar;
save stack english1.fst
